Washington statutes.
RCW 25.10.881

Unsettled demand for payment—Proceeding—Parties—Appraisers.

(1) If a demand for payment under RCW 25.10.876 remains unsettled, the limited partnership shall commence a proceeding within sixty days after receiving the payment demand and petition the court to determine the fair value of the partnership interest and accrued interest. If the limited partnership does not commence the proceeding within the sixty-day period, it shall pay each dissenter whose demand remains unsettled the amount demanded.

(2) The limited partnership shall commence the proceeding in the superior court in the county where its office is or was maintained as required by RCW 25.10.121.

(3) The limited partnership shall make all dissenters, whether or not residents of this state, whose demands remain unsettled parties to the proceeding as in an action against their partnership interests and all parties must be served with a copy of the petition. Nonresidents may be served by registered or certified mail or by publication as provided by law.

(4) The limited partnership may join as a party to the proceeding any partner who claims to be a dissenter but who has not, in the opinion of the limited partnership, complied with the provisions of this chapter. If the court determines that such partner has not complied with the provisions of this article, the partner shall be dismissed as a party.

(5) The jurisdiction of the court in which the proceeding is commenced is plenary and exclusive. The court may appoint one or more persons as appraisers to receive evidence and recommend decisions on the question of fair value. The appraisers have the powers described in the order appointing them or in any amendment to it. The dissenters are entitled to the same discovery rights as parties in other civil proceedings.

(6) Each dissenter made a party to the proceeding is entitled to judgment for the amount, if any, by which the court finds the fair value of the dissenter's partnership interest, plus interest, exceeds the amount paid by the limited partnership.

[ 2009 c 188 s 1211.]